Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2060.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-115.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-115.01. Public educational institution facilities; employees; prohibition; exception; definitions A. A facility that is run by or that operates on the property of a public educational institution may not perform or provide an abortion, unless the abortion is necessary to save the life of the woman having the abortion. B. A public educational institution may not encourage or facilitate abortions. An employee of a public educational institution who is acting in the employee's official capacity may not encourage or facilitate abortions. B. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Abortion" has the same meaning prescribed in section 36-2151. 2. "Medical emergency" has the same meaning prescribed in section 36-2151. 3. 2. "Public educational institution" means any of the following: (a) A community college as defined in section 15-1401. (b) A university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents. (c) A school district, including its schools. (d) A charter school. (e) An accommodation school. (f) The Arizona state schools for the deaf and the blind. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 15, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-115.02, to read: START_STATUTE15-115.02. Health education instruction; prohibitions; withholding of state monies; definitions A. A PUBLIC SCHOOL MAY NOT ALLOW AN ABORTION PROVIDER OR A MEDICAL FACILITY OR ORGANIZATION THAT REFERS PATIENTS TO AN ABORTION clinic TO do any of the following: 1. PROVIDE HEALTH EDUCATION INSTRUCTION IN THE SCHOOL. 2. PROVIDE HEALTH EDUCATION INSTRUCTIONAL PROGRAMS OR CURRICULA TO THE SCHOOL OR SCHOOL EMPLOYEES. 3. DISTRIBUTE OR DISPLAY ANY HEALTH EDUCATION MATERIALS OR MEDIA IN THE SCHOOL IF THE MATERIALS OR MEDIA ARE CREATED, PAID FOR OR DONATED BY THE ABORTION PROVIDER OR BEAR AN IDENTIFYING MARK OF THE ABORTION PROVIDER. B. IF THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION DETERMINES THAT A PUBLIC SCHOOL IS NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION AND IF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL FAILS TO CORRECT THE noncompliance WITHIN NINETY DAYS AFTER RECEIVING NOTICE FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION, THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION MAY WITHHOLD ANY PORTION OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL'S APPORTIONMENT OF STATE AID FROM THE DATE OF THE DETERMINATION OF NONCOMPLIANCE UNTIL THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION DETERMINES THAT THE PUBLIC SCHOOL IS COMPLYING WITH SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION. C. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION: 1. "Abortion clinic" has the same meaning prescribed in section 36-449.01. 2. "ABORTION PROVIDER" INCLUDES: (a) AN ABORTION CLINIC. (b) Any ENTITY THAT CONTROLS, IS CONTROLLED BY OR IS UNDER COMMON CONTROL WITH AN ABORTION CLINIC. (c) Any eNTITY THAT IS A PARTY TO A FRANCHISING, LICENSING OR SIMILAR AGREEMENT WITH AN ABORTION CLINIC. (d) Any INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ACTING AS AN EMPLOYEE OR REPRESENTATIVE OF AN ENTITY DESCRIBED IN subdivision (a), (b) or (c) of this PARAGRAPH. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 15-1630, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-1630. Educational facilities; employees; prohibition; exception A. No An abortion shall not be performed at any facility under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents unless such the abortion is necessary to save the life of the woman having the abortion. B. A university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents may not encourage or facilitate abortions. An employee of the Arizona board of regents or of a university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents who is acting in the employee's official capacity may not encourage or facilitate abortions. END_STATUTE